Utah statutes.
72-10-109.   Certificate of registration of aircraft required -- Exceptions.

(1) (a) A person may not operate, pilot, or navigate, or cause or authorize to be operated, piloted, or navigated within this state any civil aircraft located in this state unless the aircraft has a current certificate of registration issued by this state through the county in which the aircraft is located.

(b)  This restriction does not apply to aircraft licensed by a foreign country with which the United States has a reciprocal agreement covering the operations of the registered aircraft or to a non-passenger-carrying flight solely for inspection or test purposes authorized by the Federal Aviation Administration to be made without the certificate of registration.

(2)  Aircraft assessed by the State Tax Commission are exempt from the state registration requirement under Subsection (1).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

